data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 14221 sti simas . 692
SFX 14221 sti simomis . 693
SFX 14221 sti simom . 694
SFX 14221 sti simose . 695
SFX 14221 sti simos . 696
SFX 14221 sti simasis . 697
SFX 14221 sti simasai . 698
SFX 14221 sti simojo . 699
SFX 14221 sti simajam . 700
SFX 14221 sti simąjį . 701
SFX 14221 sti simuoju . 702
SFX 14221 sti simajame . 703
SFX 14221 sti simajam . 704
SFX 14221 sti simasis . 705
SFX 14221 sti simasai . 706
SFX 14221 sti simieji . 707
SFX 14221 sti simųjų . 708
SFX 14221 sti simiesiems . 709
SFX 14221 sti simiesiem . 710
SFX 14221 sti simuosius . 711
SFX 14221 sti simaisiais . 712
SFX 14221 sti simuosiuose . 713
SFX 14221 sti simuosiuos . 714
SFX 14221 sti simieji . 715
SFX 14221 sti simoji . 716
SFX 14221 sti simosios . 717
SFX 14221 sti simajai . 718
SFX 14221 sti simąją . 719
SFX 14221 sti simąja . 720
SFX 14221 sti simojoje . 721
SFX 14221 sti simojoj . 722
SFX 14221 sti simoji . 723
SFX 14221 sti simosios . 724
SFX 14221 sti simųjų . 725
SFX 14221 sti simosioms . 726
SFX 14221 sti simosiom . 727
SFX 14221 sti simąsias . 728
SFX 14221 sti simosiomis . 729
SFX 14221 sti simosiom . 730
SFX 14221 sti simosiose . 731
SFX 14221 sti simosios . 732
SFX 14221 šti šimas . 663
SFX 14221 šti šimo . 664
SFX 14221 šti šimam . 665
SFX 14221 šti šimą . 666
SFX 14221 šti šimu . 667
SFX 14221 šti šimame . 668
SFX 14221 šti šimam . 669
SFX 14221 šti šimas . 670
SFX 14221 šti šimi . 671
SFX 14221 šti šimų . 672
SFX 14221 šti šimiems . 673
SFX 14221 šti šimiem . 674
SFX 14221 šti šimus . 675
SFX 14221 šti šimais . 676
SFX 14221 šti šimuose . 677
SFX 14221 šti šimuos . 678
SFX 14221 šti šimi . 679
SFX 14221 šti šima . 680
SFX 14221 šti šimos . 681
SFX 14221 šti šimai . 682
SFX 14221 šti šimą . 683
SFX 14221 šti šima . 684
SFX 14221 šti šimoje . 685
SFX 14221 šti šimoj . 686
SFX 14221 šti šima . 687
SFX 14221 šti šimos . 688
SFX 14221 šti šimų . 689
SFX 14221 šti šimoms . 690
SFX 14221 šti šimom . 691
SFX 14221 šti šimas . 692
SFX 14221 šti šimomis . 693
SFX 14221 šti šimom . 694
SFX 14221 šti šimose . 695
SFX 14221 šti šimos . 696
SFX 14221 šti šimasis . 697
SFX 14221 šti šimasai . 698
SFX 14221 šti šimojo . 699
SFX 14221 šti šimajam . 700
SFX 14221 šti šimąjį . 701
SFX 14221 šti šimuoju . 702
SFX 14221 šti šimajame . 703
SFX 14221 šti šimajam . 704
SFX 14221 šti šimasis . 705
SFX 14221 šti šimasai . 706
SFX 14221 šti šimieji . 707
SFX 14221 šti šimųjų . 708
SFX 14221 šti šimiesiems . 709
SFX 14221 šti šimiesiem . 710
SFX 14221 šti šimuosius . 711
SFX 14221 šti šimaisiais . 712
SFX 14221 šti šimuosiuose . 713
SFX 14221 šti šimuosiuos . 714
SFX 14221 šti šimieji . 715
SFX 14221 šti šimoji . 716
SFX 14221 šti šimosios . 717
SFX 14221 šti šimajai . 718
SFX 14221 šti šimąją . 719
SFX 14221 šti šimąja . 720
SFX 14221 šti šimojoje . 721
SFX 14221 šti šimojoj . 722
SFX 14221 šti šimoji . 723
SFX 14221 šti šimosios . 724
SFX 14221 šti šimųjų . 725
SFX 14221 šti šimosioms . 726
SFX 14221 šti šimosiom . 727
SFX 14221 šti šimąsias . 728
SFX 14221 šti šimosiomis . 729
SFX 14221 šti šimosiom . 730
SFX 14221 šti šimosiose . 731
SFX 14221 šti šimosios . 732
SFX 14221 zti simas . 663
SFX 14221 zti simo . 664
SFX 14221 zti simam . 665
SFX 14221 zti simą . 666
SFX 14221 zti simu . 667
SFX 14221 zti simame . 668
SFX 14221 zti simam . 669
SFX 14221 zti simas . 670
SFX 14221 zti simi . 671
SFX 14221 zti simų . 672
SFX 14221 zti simiems . 673
SFX 14221 zti simiem . 674
SFX 14221 zti simus . 675
SFX 14221 zti simais . 676
SFX 14221 zti simuose . 677
SFX 14221 zti simuos . 678
SFX 14221 zti simi . 679
SFX 14221 zti sima . 680
SFX 14221 zti simos . 681
SFX 14221 zti simai . 682
SFX 14221 zti simą . 683
SFX 14221 zti sima . 684
SFX 14221 zti simoje . 685
SFX 14221 zti simoj . 686
SFX 14221 zti sima . 687
SFX 14221 zti simos . 688
SFX 14221 zti simų . 689
SFX 14221 zti simoms . 690
SFX 14221 zti simom . 691
SFX 14221 zti simas . 692
SFX 14221 zti simomis . 693
SFX 14221 zti simom . 694
SFX 14221 zti simose . 695
SFX 14221 zti simos . 696
SFX 14221 zti simasis . 697
SFX 14221 zti simasai . 698
SFX 14221 zti simojo . 699
SFX 14221 zti simajam . 700
SFX 14221 zti simąjį . 701
SFX 14221 zti simuoju . 702
SFX 14221 zti simajame . 703
SFX 14221 zti simajam . 704
SFX 14221 zti simasis . 705
SFX 14221 zti simasai . 706
SFX 14221 zti simieji . 707
SFX 14221 zti simųjų . 708
SFX 14221 zti simiesiems . 709
SFX 14221 zti simiesiem . 710
SFX 14221 zti simuosius . 711
SFX 14221 zti simaisiais . 712
SFX 14221 zti simuosiuose . 713
SFX 14221 zti simuosiuos . 714
SFX 14221 zti simieji . 715
SFX 14221 zti simoji . 716
SFX 14221 zti simosios . 717
SFX 14221 zti simajai . 718
SFX 14221 zti simąją . 719
SFX 14221 zti simąja . 720
SFX 14221 zti simojoje . 721
SFX 14221 zti simojoj . 722
SFX 14221 zti simoji . 723
SFX 14221 zti simosios . 724
SFX 14221 zti simųjų . 725
SFX 14221 zti simosioms . 726
SFX 14221 zti simosiom . 727
SFX 14221 zti simąsias . 728
SFX 14221 zti simosiomis . 729
SFX 14221 zti simosiom . 730
SFX 14221 zti simosiose . 731
SFX 14221 zti simosios . 732
SFX 14221 žti šimas . 663
SFX 14221 žti šimo . 664
SFX 14221 žti šimam . 665
SFX 14221 žti šimą . 666
SFX 14221 žti šimu . 667
SFX 14221 žti šimame . 668
SFX 14221 žti šimam . 669
SFX 14221 žti šimas . 670
SFX 14221 žti šimi . 671
SFX 14221 žti šimų . 672
SFX 14221 žti šimiems . 673
SFX 14221 žti šimiem . 674
SFX 14221 žti šimus . 675
SFX 14221 žti šimais . 676
SFX 14221 žti šimuose . 677
SFX 14221 žti šimuos . 678
SFX 14221 žti šimi . 679
SFX 14221 žti šima . 680
SFX 14221 žti šimos . 681
SFX 14221 žti šimai . 682
SFX 14221 žti šimą . 683
SFX 14221 žti šima . 684
SFX 14221 žti šimoje . 685
SFX 14221 žti šimoj . 686
SFX 14221 žti šima . 687
SFX 14221 žti šimos . 688
SFX 14221 žti šimų . 689
SFX 14221 žti šimoms . 690
SFX 14221 žti šimom . 691
SFX 14221 žti šimas . 692
SFX 14221 žti šimomis . 693
SFX 14221 žti šimom . 694
SFX 14221 žti šimose . 695
SFX 14221 žti šimos . 696
SFX 14221 žti šimasis . 697
SFX 14221 žti šimasai . 698
SFX 14221 žti šimojo . 699
SFX 14221 žti šimajam . 700
SFX 14221 žti šimąjį . 701
SFX 14221 žti šimuoju . 702
SFX 14221 žti šimajame . 703
SFX 14221 žti šimajam . 704
SFX 14221 žti šimasis . 705
SFX 14221 žti šimasai . 706
SFX 14221 žti šimieji . 707
SFX 14221 žti šimųjų . 708
SFX 14221 žti šimiesiems . 709
SFX 14221 žti šimiesiem . 710
SFX 14221 žti šimuosius . 711
SFX 14221 žti šimaisiais . 712
SFX 14221 žti šimuosiuose . 713
SFX 14221 žti šimuosiuos . 714
SFX 14221 žti šimieji . 715
SFX 14221 žti šimoji . 716
SFX 14221 žti šimosios . 717
SFX 14221 žti šimajai . 718
SFX 14221 žti šimąją . 719
SFX 14221 žti šimąja . 720
SFX 14221 žti šimojoje . 721
SFX 14221 žti šimojoj . 722
SFX 14221 žti šimoji . 723
SFX 14221 žti šimosios . 724
SFX 14221 žti šimųjų . 725
SFX 14221 žti šimosioms . 726
SFX 14221 žti šimosiom . 727
SFX 14221 žti šimąsias . 728
SFX 14221 žti šimosiomis . 729
SFX 14221 žti šimosiom . 730
SFX 14221 žti šimosiose . 731
SFX 14221 žti šimosios . 732
SFX 14221 ti damas . 733
SFX 14221 ti dami . 734
SFX 14221 ti dama . 735
SFX 14221 ti damos . 736
SFX 14221 tis damasis . 733
SFX 14221 tis damiesi . 734
SFX 14221 tis damasi . 735
SFX 14221 tis damosi . 736
SFX 14221 ti siant [^sšzž]ti 737
SFX 14221 sti siant . 737
SFX 14221 šti šiant . 737
SFX 14221 zti siant . 737
SFX 14221 žti šiant . 737
SFX 14221 tis siantis [^sšzž]tis 737
SFX 14221 stis siantis . 737
SFX 14221 štis šiantis . 737
SFX 14221 ztis siantis . 737
SFX 14221 žtis šiantis . 737
SFX 14221 ti čiau . 738
SFX 14221 ti tumei . 739
SFX 14221 ti tum . 740
SFX 14221 ti tume . 741
SFX 14221 ti tumėme . 742
SFX 14221 ti tumėm . 743
SFX 14221 ti tumėte . 744
SFX 14221 ti tumėt . 745
SFX 14221 ti tute . 746
SFX 14221 ti tų . 747
SFX 14221 tis čiausi . 738
SFX 14221 tis čiaus . 748
SFX 14221 tis tumeisi . 740
SFX 14221 tis tumeis . 749
SFX 14221 tis tumsi . 750
SFX 14221 tis tums . 750
SFX 14221 tis tumės . 741
SFX 14221 tis tumėmės . 751
SFX 14221 tis tumėtės . 744
SFX 14221 tis tutės . 746
SFX 14221 tis tųsi . 747
SFX 14221 tis tųs . 752
SFX 14221 ti k [^gk]ti 753
SFX 14221 ti ki [^gk]ti 754
SFX 14221 eiti eime [^abeiįnprštuž]eiti 755
SFX 14221 ti kime [^gk]ti 755
SFX 14221 ti kim [^gk]ti 756
SFX 14221 ti kite [^gk]ti 757
SFX 14221 ti kit [^gk]ti 758
SFX 14221 gti k . 753
SFX 14221 gti ki . 754
SFX 14221 gti kime . 755
SFX 14221 gti kim . 756
SFX 14221 gti kite . 757
SFX 14221 gti kit . 758
SFX 14221 kti k . 753
SFX 14221 kti ki . 754
SFX 14221 kti kime . 755
SFX 14221 kti kim . 756
SFX 14221 kti kite . 757
SFX 14221 kti kit . 758
SFX 14221 tis kis [^gk]tis 753
SFX 14221 tis kimės [^gk]tis 755
SFX 14221 tis kitės [^gk]tis 757
SFX 14221 gtis kis . 753
SFX 14221 gtis kimės . 755
SFX 14221 gtis kitės . 757
SFX 14221 ktis kis . 753
SFX 14221 ktis kimės . 755
SFX 14221 ktis kitės . 757

SFX 14237 Y 104
SFX 14237 ti tan . 759
SFX 14237 ti tuosna . 760
SFX 14237 ti ton . 761
SFX 14237 ti tosna . 762
SFX 14237 ti tajan . 763
SFX 14237 ti tuosiuosna . 764
SFX 14237 ti tojon . 765
SFX 14237 ti tosiosna . 766
SFX 14237 ti tinan . 767
SFX 14237 ti tinuosna . 768
SFX 14237 ti tinon . 769
SFX 14237 ti tinosna . 770
SFX 14237 ti tinajan . 771
SFX 14237 ti tinuosiuosna . 772
SFX 14237 ti tinojon . 773
SFX 14237 ti tinosiosna . 774
SFX 14237 ti davusian . 775
SFX 14237 ti davusiuosna . 776
SFX 14237 ti davusion . 777
SFX 14237 ti davusiosna . 778
SFX 14237 ti davusiajan . 779
SFX 14237 ti davusiuosiuosna . 780
SFX 14237 ti davusiojon . 781
SFX 14237 ti davusiosiosna . 782
SFX 14237 ti siančian [^sšzž]ti 783
SFX 14237 ti siančiuosna [^sšzž]ti 784
SFX 14237 ti siančion [^sšzž]ti 785
SFX 14237 ti siančiosna [^sšzž]ti 786
SFX 14237 ti siančiajan [^sšzž]ti 787
SFX 14237 ti siančiuosiuos [^sšzž]ti 788
SFX 14237 ti siančiojon [^sšzž]ti 789
SFX 14237 ti siančiosiosna [^sšzž]ti 790
SFX 14237 sti siančian . 783
SFX 14237 sti siančiuosna . 784
SFX 14237 sti siančion . 785
SFX 14237 sti siančiosna . 786
SFX 14237 sti siančiajan . 787
SFX 14237 sti siančiuosiuos . 788
SFX 14237 sti siančiojon . 789
SFX 14237 sti siančiosiosna . 790
SFX 14237 šti šiančian . 783
SFX 14237 šti šiančiuosna . 784
SFX 14237 šti šiančion . 785
SFX 14237 šti šiančiosna . 786
SFX 14237 šti šiančiajan . 787
SFX 14237 šti šiančiuosiuos . 788
SFX 14237 šti šiančiojon . 789
SFX 14237 šti šiančiosiosna . 790
SFX 14237 zti siančian . 783
SFX 14237 zti siančiuosna . 784
SFX 14237 zti siančion . 785
SFX 14237 zti siančiosna . 786
SFX 14237 zti siančiajan . 787
SFX 14237 zti siančiuosiuos . 788
SFX 14237 zti siančiojon . 789
SFX 14237 zti siančiosiosna . 790
SFX 14237 žti šiančian . 783
SFX 14237 žti šiančiuosna . 784
SFX 14237 žti šiančion . 785
SFX 14237 žti šiančiosna . 786
SFX 14237 žti šiančiajan . 787
SFX 14237 žti šiančiuosiuos . 788
SFX 14237 žti šiančiojon . 789
SFX 14237 žti šiančiosiosna . 790
SFX 14237 ti siman [^sšzž]ti 791
SFX 14237 ti simuosna [^sšzž]ti 792
SFX 14237 ti simon [^sšzž]ti 793
SFX 14237 ti simosna [^sšzž]ti 794
SFX 14237 ti simajan [^sšzž]ti 795
SFX 14237 ti simuosiuosna [^sšzž]ti 796
SFX 14237 ti simojon [^sšzž]ti 797
SFX 14237 ti simosiosna [^sšzž]ti 798
SFX 14237 sti siman . 791
SFX 14237 sti simuosna . 792
SFX 14237 sti simon . 793
SFX 14237 sti simosna . 794
SFX 14237 sti simajan . 795
SFX 14237 sti simuosiuosna . 796
SFX 14237 sti simojon . 797
SFX 14237 sti simosiosna . 798
SFX 14237 šti šiman . 791
SFX 14237 šti šimuosna . 792
SFX 14237 šti šimon . 793
SFX 14237 šti šimosna . 794
SFX 14237 šti šimajan . 795
SFX 14237 šti šimuosiuosna . 796
SFX 14237 šti šimojon . 797
SFX 14237 šti šimosiosna . 798
SFX 14237 zti siman . 791
SFX 14237 zti simuosna . 792
SFX 14237 zti simon . 793
SFX 14237 zti simosna . 794
SFX 14237 zti simajan . 795
SFX 14237 zti simuosiuosna . 796
SFX 14237 zti simojon . 797
SFX 14237 zti simosiosna . 798
SFX 14237 žti šiman . 791
SFX 14237 žti šimuosna . 792
SFX 14237 žti šimon . 793
SFX 14237 žti šimosna . 794
SFX 14237 žti šimajan . 795
SFX 14237 žti šimuosiuosna . 796
SFX 14237 žti šimojon . 797
SFX 14237 žti šimosiosna . 798
